Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6604HH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2183 Section 1. Section 328.56, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A state aviation fund is created under the authority of 3 the department. The fund shall consist of moneys deposited in 4 the fund pursuant to sections 328.36 , 423.43, and 452A.82 and 5 other moneys appropriated to the fund. 6 Sec. 2. Section 423.43, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. Except as provided in subsections 2 , and 3 , and 4 , 9 all revenue arising under the operation of the use tax under 10 subchapter III shall be deposited into the general fund of the 11 state. 12 Sec. 3. Section 423.43, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. All revenues attributable to the 15 imposition of the excise tax upon the purchase of aircraft 16 subject to taxation under section 423.5, subsection 1, 17 paragraph âaâ , shall be credited to the state aviation fund 18 created in section 328.56. 19